Washington statutes.
RCW 24.36.210

Bylaws of association—Primary elections to nominate directors.

The bylaws may provide that primary elections shall be held to nominate directors. Where the bylaws provide that the territory in which the association has members shall be divided into districts, the bylaws may also provide that the results of the primary elections in the various districts shall be final and shall be ratified at the annual meeting of the association.

[ 1959 c 312 s 21.]